North Carolina, session 2025, HB971.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Pilot Program Established; Purpose. – The Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall create an Annual Career Development Plan Pilot Program (Program) for
students entering the seventh grade at select schools during the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school
years and continuing through the students' graduation from high school. The purpose of the
Program shall be to evaluate the efficacy of reviewing Career Development Plans (Plans)
annually to better align students for on-time graduation and achievement of college and career
goals and to ensure that all students graduate from high school college or career ready.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply to this Section:
(1) Career Development Plan. – An individual plan created by each student that
establishes the student's plan throughout middle and high school for
graduation and career development pursuant to G.S. 115C-158.10.
(2) Local board of education. – A local board of education governing a partnered
school.
(3) Partnered school. – A middle school and high school governed by a local
board of education where at least half of the student population of the middle
school is assigned to attend the associated high school.
(4) Parent. – Defined in G.S. 115C-76.1.
SECTION 1.(c) Partnered Schools. – The Superintendent shall select 12 partnered
schools that are proportionally representative of the population size and geographic distribution
of public high schools in the State. The Superintendent shall provide a process for schools to
apply to participate in the Program as partnered schools. The Superintendent shall be responsible
for the final selection of partnered schools. In the event that there are fewer than 12 applicants,
the Superintendent shall collaborate with local superintendents to select schools to be partnered
schools. Partnered schools shall have each student entering the seventh grade during the
2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years complete an annual review of Plans.
SECTION 1.(d) Local Board of Education and IEP Support. – The local board of
education shall ensure that students in partnered schools are provided assistance by a school
counselor and planning time during the instructional day each school year to update their Plans.
For students with disabilities, the student's IEP team, if applicable, may assist the student in
completing and updating the Plan. Updates to Plans shall be made prior to student scheduling of
courses for the next school year.
*H971-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(e) Parental Involvement. – Partnered schools shall encourage parents
to participate in development of Plans with their students and to sign a form provided by the
school acknowledging the annual revisions of the Plans. Local boards of education shall ensure
that Plans are easily accessible to students and parents and shall provide parents annual written
notice of the creation or revision of a Plan, information on how to access the Plan, a listing of
course offerings for the next school year with a description of the content of each course, and
high school graduation requirements where appropriate. Prior to creating or updating a student's
Plan, a school counselor shall attempt to meet with the student's parent, either in person or
virtually, to explain the possible effects that the Plan might have on the student's graduation
requirements and career development planning. Beginning in the tenth grade and continuing
throughout the student's high school enrollment, a school counselor shall provide each student
and parent information regarding State and federal need-based and merit-based financial aid
programs to support postsecondary education and training using information provided by the
State Education Assistance Authority and College Foundation of North Carolina. The school
counselor shall also provide information on the federal free application for federal student aid
(FAFSA), its use, and notify the parent that information included in the FAFSA is confidential
and not accessible by the school.
SECTION 1.(f) Initial Career Development Plans. – Students in seventh grade in
partnered schools shall develop an initial career development plan which will provide guidance
as students develop Plans.
SECTION 1.(g) Annual Career Development Plan Updates. – In partnered schools,
Plans shall be updated annually in addition to the following information being provided to
students:
(1) For eighth grade students, by the end of the school year, a list of the required
core courses to be taken in ninth and tenth grade.
(2) For tenth grade students, an identification of the graduation requirements
relevant to the student's chosen postsecondary goals based on the student's
career development planning.
(3) For eleventh grade students not meeting the career and college readiness
standards established by the State Board of Community Colleges, a plan for
enrolling in remedial coursework for his or her senior year.
(4) Any other minimum requirements established by the Superintendent.
SECTION 1.(h) Reporting Requirement. – The Superintendent or a local board of
education shall develop reporting requirements for partnered schools participating in the Program
to provide information on the effectiveness of the annual review of the Plans. The Superintendent
shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by August 15, 2026, and
each year thereafter on the progress of the Program, including any logistical issues that have
arisen with the Program.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 971-First Edition